Illinois, session 104th, SB4106.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary respectively, are appropriated to the 7Department of Military Affairs for the purposes hereinafter 8named:9FOR OPERATIONS - STATEWIDE10Payable from General Revenue Fund:11  For Operational Expenses of the12   Department......................................21,203,80013  For State Officers' Candidate school..................1,50014  For Lincoln's Challenge...........................3,200,00015    Total                                         $24,405,30016Payable from Federal Support Agreement Revolving Fund:17  For Lincoln's Challenge, including18   prior years' costs...............................8,600,00019FACILITIES OPERATIONS20Payable from Federal Support Agreement  21 Revolving Fund:22  Army/Air Reimbursable Positions..................14,610,700   SB4106- 2 -OMB104 00199 MMV 10199 b1    Section 10. The sum of $20,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Support 3Agreement Revolving Fund to the Department of Military Affairs 4for the Facilities Division for expenses related to Army 5National Guard Facilities operations and maintenance as 6provided for in the Cooperative Funding Agreements, including 7prior years' costs. 8    Section 15. The sum of $127,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 10the Department of Military Affairs for the Office of the 11Adjutant General Division for expenses related to the care and 12preservation of historic artifacts. 13    Section 20. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Military Affairs 15Trust Fund to the Department of Military Affairs for the 16Office of the Adjutant General Division to support youth and 17other programs, provided such amounts shall not exceed funds 18to be made available from public or private sources. 19    Section 25. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Military 21Family Relief Fund to the Department of Military Affairs for 22the Office of the Adjutant General Division for the issuance 23of grants to persons or families of persons who are members of   SB4106- 3 -OMB104 00199 MMV 10199 b1the Illinois National Guard or Illinois residents who are 2members of the armed forces of the United States and who meet 3the eligibility requirements found at 20 ILCS 105/22-9, 4including prior years' costs. 5    Section 30. The sum of $850,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Department of Military Affairs for deposit into the 8Federal Support Agreement Revolving Fund. 9    Section 35. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the State Military Justice 11Fund to the Department of Military Affairs for expenses of 12military justice as provided in the Illinois Code of Military 13Justice. 14    Section 40. The sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 16the Department of Military Affairs for deposit into the 17Illinois Military Family Relief Fund. 18    Section 45. No contract shall be entered into or 19obligation incurred for any expenditures from the 20appropriations made in Sections 40 until after the purposes 21and amounts have been approved in writing by the Governor. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1,   SB4106- 4 -OMB104 00199 MMV 10199 b12026.